Utah statutes.
10-3-913.   Authority of chief of police.

(1)  The chief of police has the same authority as the sheriff within the boundaries of the municipality of appointment.   The chief has authority to:

(a)  suppress riots, disturbances, and breaches of the peace;

(b)  apprehend all persons violating state laws or city ordinances;

(c)  diligently discharge his duties and enforce all ordinances of the city to preserve the peace, good order, and protection of the rights and property of all persons; and

(d)  attend the municipal justice court located within the city when required, provide security for the court, and obey its orders and directions.

(2)  This section is not a limitation of a police chief's statewide authority as otherwise provided by law.

(3)  The chief of police shall, on or before January 1, 2003, adopt a written policy that prohibits the stopping, detention, or search of any person when the action is solely motivated by considerations of race, color, ethnicity, age, or gender.



Amended by Chapter 219, 2002 General Session

